Massachusetts, session 194th, H2083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 52D of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 6, the words "by blood or marriage to the 
employee, including a" and inserting in place thereof the following words:-  
"by blood, marriage, or adoption to the employee, including a parent or an adoptive."